test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-miskawew_gt-norm.yaml
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-miskawak, êmiskawak] # SET I
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-miskawat, êmiskawat]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-miskawâyâhk, êmiskawâyâhk]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-miskawâyahk, êmiskawâyahk]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-miskawâyêk, êmiskawâyêk]

     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [ê-miskawakik, êmiskawakik] # SET I-Pl
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [ê-miskawacik, êmiskawacik]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [ê-miskawâyâhkik, êmiskawâyâhkik]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [ê-miskawâyahkok, êmiskawâyahkok]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [ê-miskawâyêkok, êmiskawâyêkok] 
     
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [ê-miskawiyan, êmiskawiyan] # SET II
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-miskawiyâhk, êmiskawiyâhk]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [ê-miskawiyêk, êmiskawiyêk]    
     
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-miskawât, êmiskawât] # SET III
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-miskawâcik, êmiskawâcik]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [ê-miskâmât, êmiskâmât]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-miskâmâcik, êmiskâmâcik]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-miskawâyit, êmiskawâyit]

     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-miskâmak, êmiskâmak] # SET IV
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-miskâmat, êmiskâmat]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-miskâmâyâhk, êmiskâmâyâhk]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-miskâmâyahk, êmiskâmâyahk]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-miskâmâyek, êmiskâmâyek]
     
     
     
     
     
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-miskawit, êmiskawit] # SET I inv
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-miskâsk, êmiskâsk]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-miskâkoyâhk, êmiskâkoyâhk]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-miskâkoyahk, êmiskâkoyahk]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-miskâkoyek, êmiskâkoyek]

     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-miskâcik, êmiskâcik] # SET I-Pl inv
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-miskâskik, êmiskâskik]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-miskâkoyâhkik, êmiskâkoyâhkik]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-miskâkoyahkok, êmiskâkoyahkok]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-miskâkoyêkok, êmiskâkoyêkok]

     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [ê-miskâtân, êmiskâtân] # SET II inv
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: [ê-miskâtâhk, êmiskâtâhk]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [ê-miskâtakok, êmiskâtakok]

     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [ê-miskâkot, êmiskâkot] # SET III inv
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [ê-miskâkocik, êmiskâkocik]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-miskâkoyit, êmiskâkoyit]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: [ê-miskâyit, êmiskâyit] # SET IV inv
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: [ê-miskâyisk, êmiskâyisk]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-miskâkoyâhk, êmiskâkoyâhk, ê-miskâkowâyâhk, êmiskâkowâyâhk]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [ê-miskâkoyêk, êmiskâkoyêk, ê-miskâkowâyêk, êmiskâkowâyêk]
     PV/e+miskawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [ê-miskâkoyahk, êmiskâkoyahk, ê-miskâkowâyahk, êmiskâkowâyahk]





     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: miskaw
     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: miskawâtân
     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: miskâhk
     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: miskawik
     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: miskawâtânik
     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: miskâhkok

     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: miskawâhkan
     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: miskawâhkahk
     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: miskawâhkêk
     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: miskawâhkanik
     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: miskawâhkahkok
     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: miskawâhkêkok

     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: miskawin
     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: miskawinân
     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: miskawik
     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: miskawîhkan
     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: miskawîhkâhk
     miskawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: miskawîhkêk
     
     
     
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-miskâmiw, niwîwîcimiskâmiw] # SET I (past)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-miskâmiw, kiwîwîcimiskâmiw]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-miskâminân, niwîwîcimiskâminân]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-miskâminaw, kiwîwîcimiskâminaw]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-miskâmiwâw, kiwîwîcimiskâmiwâw]
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-miskâmiwak, niwîwîcimiskâmiwak] # SET I-Pl (past)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-miskâmiwak, kiwîwîcimiskâmiwak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-miskâminânak, niwîwîcimiskâminânak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-miskâminawak, kiwîwîcimiskâminawak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-miskâmiwâwak, kiwîwîcimiskâmiwâwak]
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-miskâmin, kiwîwîcimiskâmin] # SET II (past)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-miskâminân, kiwîwîcimiskâminân]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-misknawiminwâw, kiwîwîcimiskâminâwâw]
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-miskâmêw, wîmiskâmêw] # SET III (past)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-miskâmêwak, wîmiskâmêwak]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-miskâmêyiwa, wîmiskâmêyiwa]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-miskâmêw, wîmiskâmêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-miskâmimêwak, wîmiskâmimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-miskâmimâwa, niwîwîcimiskâmimâwa] # SET IV (past)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-miskâmimâwa, kiwîwîcimiskâmimâwa]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-miskâmimânâna, niwîwîcimiskâmimânâna]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-miskâmimânawa, kiwîwîcimiskâmimânawa]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-miskâmimâwâwa, kiwîwîcimiskâmimâwâwa]


     
     
     
     

     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO: miskawaki # 1 and 2-3Sg
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO: miskawaci
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO: miskawâyâhki
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO: [miskawâyahko, miskawâyahki]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO: miskawâyêko

     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: miskawâci # 3-4, 4-5
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: miskawâtwâwi
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: miskawâyici
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO: miskawakwâwi # 1 and 2-3Pl
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO: miskawatwâwi
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO: miskawâyâhkwâwi
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO: miskawâyahkwâwi
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO: miskawâyêkwâwi

     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO: miskawici # 1 and 2-3Sg INVERSE (3Sg-1 and 2)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO: miskâski
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO: miskâkoyâhki
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO: [miskâkoyahko, miskâkoyahki]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO: miskâkoyêko
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: miskâkoci # 3-4, 4-5 INVERSE (4-3, 5-4)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: miskâkotwâwi 
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: miskâikoyici
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1SgO: miskawitwâwi # 1 and 2-3Pl INVERSE (3Pl-1 and 2)
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2SgO: miskâskwâwi
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO: miskâkoyâhkwâwi
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO: miskâkoyahkwâwi
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO: miskâkoyêkwâwi
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO: miskawiyani # Local sets (2-1) Okimāsis 116
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO: miskawiyêko
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: miskawiyâhki
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2SgO: miskâtân # Local sets INV (1-2) Okimāsis 115
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2PlO: miskâtako
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: miskâtâhki
     
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: miskâmaki # SET IV
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: miskâmati
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: miskâmâyâhki
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [miskâmâyahko, miskâmâyahki]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: miskâmâyeko

     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: miskâyiti # SET IV inv
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: miskâyiski
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [miskâkoyâhki, miskâkowâyâhki]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [miskâkoyêko, miskâkowâyêko]
     miskawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [miskâkoyahko, miskâkoyahki, miskâkowâyahko, miskâkowâyahki]
